District of Columbia statutes.
31-3931.23

Repeal and transition provisions.

(a)

Chapter 39 of this title is repealed, subject to the provisions of this section.

(b)

All existing fees set forth in Chapter 39 of this title, shall remain in effect under the corresponding provisions of this chapter, and shall be applicable to protected cells, unless modified or repealed by rules promulgated by the Commissioner.

(c)

All effective certificates of authority and all conditions imposed on the certificates of authority shall apply to the extent they would have applied under prior law.

(d)

All captive insurers granted a certificate of authority as sponsored captive insurers under prior law shall comply with all of the provisions found in this chapter.

Mar. 17, 2005, D.C. Law 15-262, § 24, 52 DCR 1205
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 54(d), 53 DCR 6794
Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-203, § 2(m), 61 DCR 12572

History

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-203 substituted “protected cells” for “segregated accounts” in (b).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 24 of Captive Insurance Company Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-640, November 30, 2004, 52 DCR 1238).

Emergency Legislation